Ohio, session 136, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.617 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.617. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 7
lanes of interstate route number two hundred eighty between 8
Navarre avenue and front street, in Lucas county, shall be known 9
as the "SSG Jack W. Coy Veterans Memorial Highway." 10
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 11
along the highway indicating its name. 12